Florida, session 2026, SB506.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (6) is added to section 119.0713, 20 Florida Statutes, to read: 21 119.0713âLocal government agency exemptions from inspection 22 or copying of public records.â 23 (6)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 24 1.ââBody cameraâ means a portable electronic recording 25 device that is worn on a code inspectorâs body and that records 26 audio and video data in the course of the performance of his or 27 her official duties and responsibilities. 28 2.ââCode inspectorâ has the same meaning as in s. 29 162.04(2). 30 3.ââPersonal representativeâ means a parent, a court 31 appointed guardian, an attorney, or an agent of, or a person 32 holding a power of attorney for, a person recorded by a body 33 camera. If a person depicted in the recording is deceased, the 34 term also means the personal representative of the estate of the 35 deceased person; the deceased personâs surviving spouse, parent, 36 or adult child; the deceased personâs attorney or agent; or the 37 parent or guardian of a surviving minor child of the deceased. 38 An agent must possess written authorization of the recorded 39 person to act on his or her behalf. 40 (b)âA body camera recording, or a portion thereof, is 41 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 42 of the State Constitution if the recording: 43 1.âIs taken within the interior of a private residence; 44 2.âIs taken within the interior of a facility that offers 45 health care, mental health care, or social services; or 46 3.âIs taken in a place that a reasonable person would 47 expect to be private. 48 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), a body camera recording, 49 or a portion thereof, may be disclosed by a local government: 50 1.âIn furtherance of its official duties and 51 responsibilities; or 52 2.âTo another governmental agency in the furtherance of its 53 official duties and responsibilities. 54 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), a body camera recording, 55 or a portion thereof, must be disclosed by a local government: 56 1.âTo a person recorded by the body camera; however, a 57 local government may disclose only those portions relevant to 58 the personâs presence in the recording; 59 2.âTo the personal representative of a person recorded by 60 the body camera; however, a local government may disclose only 61 those portions relevant to the represented personâs presence in 62 the recording; 63 3.âTo a person not depicted in the body camera recording if 64 the recording depicts a place in which the person lawfully 65 resided, dwelled, or lodged at the time of the recording; 66 however, a local government may disclose only those portions 67 that record the interior of such a place; or 68 4.âPursuant to a court order. 69 a.âIn addition to any other grounds the court may consider 70 in determining whether to order that a body camera recording be 71 disclosed, the court shall consider whether: 72 (I)âDisclosure is necessary to advance a compelling 73 interest; 74 (II)âThe recording contains information that is otherwise 75 exempt or confidential and exempt under the law; 76 (III)âThe person requesting disclosure is seeking to obtain 77 evidence to determine legal issues in a case in which the person 78 is a party; 79 (IV)âDisclosure would reveal information regarding a person 80 which is of a highly sensitive personal nature; 81 (V)âDisclosure may harm the reputation or jeopardize the 82 safety of a person depicted in the recording; 83 (VI)âConfidentiality is necessary to prevent a serious and 84 imminent threat to the fair, impartial, and orderly 85 administration of justice; 86 (VII)âThe recording could be redacted to protect privacy 87 interests; and 88 (VIII)âThere is good cause to disclose all or portions of 89 the recording. 90 b.âIn any proceeding regarding the disclosure of a body 91 camera recording, the local government that made the recording 92 must be given reasonable notice of hearings and an opportunity 93 to participate. 94 (e)âA local government shall retain a body camera recording 95 for at least 90 days. 96 (f)âThe exemption provided in paragraph (b) applies 97 retroactively. 98 (g)âThis subsection does not supersede any other public 99 records exemption that existed before or is created after the 100 effective date of this exemption. Those portions of a recording 101 which are protected from disclosure by another public records 102 exemption continue to be exempt or confidential and exempt. 103 (h)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 104 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 105 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 106 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 107 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 108 necessity that the following types of body camera recordings 109 recorded by a code inspector in the course of performing his or 110 her official duties and responsibilities be made confidential 111 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), 112 Article I of the State Constitution: recordings taken within the 113 interior of a private residence; recordings taken within the 114 interior of a facility that offers health care, mental health 115 care, or social services; and recordings taken in a place that a 116 reasonable person would expect to be private. 117 (2)âThe Legislature recognizes that body cameras preserve 118 information that has the potential to assist both code 119 inspectorsâ and the publicâs ability to review the accuracy of 120 code inspection work. 121 (3)âHowever, the Legislature also finds that, in certain 122 instances, audio and video recorded by body cameras is 123 significantly likely to capture highly sensitive personal 124 information. The exemption of body camera recordings from public 125 records requirements allows code inspectors to administer their 126 duties more effectively and efficiently, which would otherwise 127 be significantly impaired. The Legislature finds that the 128 concerns regarding the impact of public records requirements for 129 body camera recordings necessitate the exemption of the 130 recordings from public records requirements and outweigh any 131 public benefit that may be derived from their disclosure. 132 Section 3.âBy October 1, 2026, the Division of Library and 133 Information Services of the Department of State shall by rule 134 incorporate into the appropriate general records schedule a 90 135 day retention requirement for body camera recordings recorded by 136 code inspectors. 137 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 138 SB 504 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 139 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 140 thereof and becomes a law.